North Dakota statutes. TITLE 52 Social Security
CHAPTER 52-08 North Dakota State Employment Service

52-08-01.
Acceptance of Wagner-Peyser Act by state of North Dakota.

The state of North Dakota accepts and will observe and comply with the provisions of the Wagner-Peyser Act approved June 6, 1933, which was “An Act to provide for the establishment of a national employment system and for cooperation with the states in the promotion of such system, and for other purposes” [48 Stat. 113; 29 U.S.C. 49].

Source:

S.L. 1935, ch. 161, § 5; 1937, ch. 232, § 13, subs. a; 1939, ch. 215, § 13, subs. a; R.C. 1943, § 52-0801.

52-08-02.
Job service North Dakota agent of state for Wagner-Peyser Act.

For the purposes provided for in the preceding section, job service North Dakota is designated and constituted the agency of this state to carry out the purposes of this chapter.

Source:

S.L. 1935, ch. 161, § 6; 1937, ch. 232, § 13, subs. a; 1939, ch. 215, § 13, subs. a; R.C. 1943, § 52-0802; S.L. 1979, ch. 522, § 4.

52-08-03.
Job service North Dakota — Offices maintained.

The job service North Dakota executive director shall establish and maintain free public employment offices in such number and in such places as may be necessary for the proper administration of chapters 52-01 through 52-08.

Source:

S.L. 1937, ch. 232, § 13, subs. a; 1939, ch. 215, § 13, subs. a; R.C. 1943, § 52-0803; S.L. 1965, ch. 333, § 6; 1979, ch. 522, § 5.

52-08-04.
Merit system and personnel — Agreements for free employment service. [Repealed]

Repealed by S.L. 1965, ch. 333, § 9.

52-08-05.
Director of employment service — Duties. [Repealed]

Repealed by S.L. 1965, ch. 333, § 9.

52-08-06.
Financing of employment service — Regulations governing. [Repealed]

Repealed by S.L. 1965, ch. 333, § 9.

52-08-07.
Administration and organization of employment service. [Repealed]

Repealed by S.L. 1965, ch. 333, § 9.

52-08-08.
Institution to serve workforce needs.

Subject to state board of higher education policies, the president of an institution of higher education that is assigned primary responsibility for workforce training shall establish a division or other unit within the institution to serve the workforce needs of business and industry and to serve as a broker in arranging the delivery of training.

Source:

S.L. 1999, ch. 439, § 3.

52-08-09.
Workforce training board — Formation.

Subject to state board of higher education policies, the president of an institution of higher education that is assigned primary responsibility for workforce training shall appoint a workforce training board consisting of representatives from businesses, labor, and industries located within the institution’s delivery area. The workforce training board must consist of at least seven but no more than fifteen members and must include at least one representative from either an Indian-owned business, the tribal government, or the tribal colleges within the designated region.

Source:

S.L. 1999, ch. 439, § 4.

52-08-10.
Preparation of business plan — Revolving loans.

Subject to state board of higher education policies, the president of an institution of higher education that is assigned primary responsibility for workforce training shall prepare an annual business plan that must include provisions for use of the training capacity of the tribal colleges within the designated region, in consultation with the workforce training board. The business plan may include participation as a community under the new jobs training program under chapter 52-02.1. The workforce training board shall approve the business plan and make recommendations for funding of the business plan to the state board of higher education. Any state funds received under this program by the institutions of higher education assigned primary responsibility for workforce training must be used for business and customized training activities. The state board of higher education may establish for each institution of higher education assigned primary responsibility for workforce training a revolving loan fund for workforce training program startups using the borrowing authority provided in section 15-10-16.1.

Source:

S.L. 1999, ch. 439, § 5; 2011, ch. 16, § 6; 2011, ch. 376, § 2.

Effective Date.

The 2011 amendment of this section by section 6 of chapter 16, S.L. 2011 became effective July 1, 2011.

The 2011 amendment of this section by section 2 of chapter 376, S.L. 2011 became effective May 17, 2011, pursuant to an emergency clause in section 4 of chapter 376, S.L. 2011.

52-08-11.
Performance measurements for workforce training.

Subject to state board of higher education policies, the president of an institution of higher education that is assigned primary responsibility for workforce training shall develop, in consultation with the workforce training board, performance measurements for workforce training. The measurements must include requirements for being time-sensitive and results-oriented and must determine how well the training needs of business and industry are being met.

Source:

S.L. 1999, ch. 439, § 6.

52-08-12.
Workforce training funds — Distribution. [Repealed]

Repealed by S.L. 2003, ch. 445, § 1.

52-08-13.
Job task analysis services — Testing services — Job fair services — Personal re-employment account services — Authorization to charge fees — Continuing appropriation.

Job service North Dakota may provide job task analysis services, testing services, and job fair services to an employer requesting these services and may provide personal re-employment account services to an individual requesting those services. Notwithstanding the reference to free public employment offices in this chapter or in any other provision of law, job service North Dakota may charge reasonable fees for providing job task analysis services, testing services, job fair services, and personal re-employment account services. All fees collected under this section must be deposited in a separate interest-bearing account at the Bank of North Dakota and must be used for the purpose of providing job task analysis services, testing services, job fair services, and personal re-employment account services. Moneys in this fund are appropriated on a continuing basis for the purpose of providing job task analysis services, testing services, job fair services, and personal re-employment account services.

Source:

S.L. 2001, ch. 42, § 6; 2005, ch. 461, § 1.